Hawaii statutes.
B.
Administrative Dissolution

§414-401 Grounds for administrative
dissolution. The department director may commence a proceeding under
section 414-402 to administratively dissolve a corporation if the corporation
fails to:

(1) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(2) File its annual report for a period of two years;

(3) Appoint and maintain an agent for service of
process as required; or

(4) File a statement of a change in the name of the
agent as required under chapter 425R. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c
130, §28; am L 2003, c 124, §8; am L 2009, c 55, §10]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next